Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2233
Nursing program; application; form.

An application to conduct a program of nursing shall be made in writing upon a form to be approved and furnished by the board.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 15(2), p. 843;

Laws 1955, c. 272, § 7, p. 858;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 25;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.25;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 789.